Utah statutes.
31A-22-308.   Persons covered by personal injury protection.
The following may receive benefits under personal injury protection coverage:
(1)  the named insured, when injured in an accident involving any motor
vehicle, regardless of whether the accident occurs in this state, the United
States, its territories or possessions, or Canada, except where the injury is
the result of the use or operation of the named insured's own motor vehicle
not actually insured under the policy;
(2)  persons related to the insured by blood, marriage, adoption, or
guardianship who are residents of the insured's household, including those who
usually make their home in the same household but temporarily live elsewhere
under the circumstances described in Section (1), except where the person is
injured as a result of the use or operation of his own motor vehicle not
insured under the policy; and
(3)  any other natural person whose injuries arise out of an automobile
accident occurring while the person occupies a motor vehicle described in the
policy with the express or implied consent of the named insured or while a
pedestrian if he is injured in an accident occurring in Utah involving the
described motor vehicle.
